dicts/be_BY/be_BY.aff
SFX V Y 58
SFX V ы ага ы 
SFX V ы аму ы 
SFX V ы ым ы 
SFX V ы ая ы 
SFX V ы ай ы 
SFX V ы ую ы 
SFX V ы аю ы 
SFX V ы ае ы 
SFX V ы ыя ы 
SFX V ы ых ы 
SFX V ы ым ы 
SFX V ы ымі ы 
SFX V ы ых ы 
SFX V і ага [гкх]і 
SFX V і аму [гкх]і 
SFX V і ім [гкх]і 
SFX V і ая [гкх]і 
SFX V і ай [гкх]і 
SFX V і ую [гкх]і 
SFX V і аю [гкх]і 
SFX V і ае [гкх]і 
SFX V і яга [нц]і 
SFX V і яму [нц]і 
SFX V і ім [нц]і 
SFX V і яя [нц]і 
SFX V і яй [нц]і 
SFX V і юю [нц]і 
SFX V і яю [нц]і 
SFX V і яе [нц]і 
SFX V і ія і 
SFX V і іх і 
SFX V і ім і 
SFX V і імі і 
SFX V і іх і 
SFX V ў вага [аеёо]ў 
SFX V ў ваму [аеёо]ў 
SFX V ў вым [аеёо]ў 
SFX V ў ва [аеёо]ў 
SFX V ў вай [аеёо]ў 
SFX V ў ву [аеёо]ў 
SFX V ў вай [аеёо]ў 
SFX V ў вы [аеёо]ў 
SFX V ў вых [аеёо]ў 
SFX V ў вым [аеёо]ў 
SFX V ў вымі [аеёо]ў 
SFX V ў вых [аеёо]ў 
SFX V н нага [іы]н 
SFX V н наму [іы]н 
SFX V н ным [іы]н 
SFX V н на [іы]н 
SFX V н най [іы]н 
SFX V н ну [іы]н 
SFX V н най [іы]н 
SFX V н ны [іы]н 
SFX V н ных [іы]н 
SFX V н ным [іы]н 
SFX V н нымі [іы]н 
SFX V н ных [іы]н 
SFX X Y 3
SFX X ы а ы 
SFX X і а [гкх]і 
SFX X і а ні 
SFX Z Y 26
SFX Z ы ога ы 
SFX Z ы ому ы 
SFX Z ы ым ы 
SFX Z ы ое ы 
SFX Z ы ая ы 
SFX Z ы ой ы 
SFX Z ы ую ы 
SFX Z ы ою ы 
SFX Z ы ыя ы 
SFX Z ы ых ы 
SFX Z ы ым ы 
SFX Z ы ымі ы 
SFX Z ы ых ы 
SFX Z і ога і 
SFX Z і ому і 
SFX Z і ім і 
SFX Z і ое і 
SFX Z і ая і 
SFX Z і ой і 
SFX Z і ую і 
SFX Z і ою і 
SFX Z і ія і 
SFX Z і іх і 
SFX Z і ім і 
SFX Z і імі і 
SFX Z і іх і 
SFX S Y 47
SFX S ы ага ы 
SFX S ы аму ы 
SFX S ы ым ы 
SFX S ы ая ы 
SFX S ы ай ы 
SFX S ы ую ы 
SFX S ы аю ы 
SFX S ы ыя ы 
SFX S ы ых ы 
SFX S ы ым ы 
SFX S ы ымі ы 
SFX S ы ых ы 
SFX S і ага [гкх]і 
SFX S і аму [гкх]і 
SFX S і ім [гкх]і 
SFX S і ая [гкх]і 
SFX S і ай [гкх]і 
SFX S і ую [гкх]і 
SFX S і аю [гкх]і 
SFX S і яга [нц]і 
SFX S і яму [нц]і 
SFX S і ім [нц]і 
SFX S і яя [нц]і 
SFX S і яй [нц]і 
SFX S і юю [нц]і 
SFX S і яю [нц]і 
SFX S і ія і 
SFX S і іх і 
SFX S і ім і 
SFX S і імі і 
SFX S і іх і 
SFX S ў ва [аеёо]ў 
SFX S ў ву [аеёо]ў 
SFX S ў вым [аеёо]ў 
SFX S ў вай [аеёо]ў 
SFX S ў вы [аеёо]ў 
SFX S ў вых [аеёо]ў 
SFX S ў вым [аеёо]ў 
SFX S ў вымі [аеёо]ў 
SFX S н на [іы]н 
SFX S н ну [іы]н 
SFX S н ным [іы]н 
SFX S н най [і]н 
SFX S н ны [іы]н 
SFX S н ных [іы]н 
SFX S н ным [іы]н 
SFX S н нымі [іы]н 
SFX c Y 30
SFX c у еш [бвзмнс]у 
SFX c гу жаш гу 
SFX c у зеш ду 
SFX c у аш [жрчш]у 
SFX c ку чаш ку 
SFX c ту цеш ту 
SFX c у е [бвзмнс]у 
SFX c гу жа гу 
SFX c у зе ду 
SFX c у а [жрчш]у 
SFX c ку ча ку 
SFX c ту це ту 
SFX c у ем [бвзмнс]у 
SFX c гу жам гу 
SFX c у зем ду 
SFX c у ам [жрчш]у 
SFX c ку чам ку 
SFX c ту цем ту 
SFX c у еце [бвзмнс]у 
SFX c гу жаце гу 
SFX c у зеце ду 
SFX c у аце [жрчш]у 
SFX c ку чаце ку 
SFX c ту цеце ту 
SFX c у уць у 
SFX c ю еш ю 
SFX c ю е ю 
SFX c ю ем ю 
SFX c ю еце ю 
SFX c ю юць ю 
SFX e Y 26
SFX e у еш [бвзмнпс]у 
SFX e гу жэш гу 
SFX e у зеш ду 
SFX e у эш [жрчш]у 
SFX e ку чэш ку 
SFX e ту цеш ту 
SFX e у е [бвзмнпс]у 
SFX e гу жэ гу 
SFX e у зе ду 
SFX e у э [жрчш]у 
SFX e ку чэ ку 
SFX e ту це ту 
SFX e у ём [бвзмнпс]у 
SFX e гу жом гу 
SFX e у зём ду 
SFX e у ом [жрчш]у 
SFX e ку чом ку 
SFX e ту цём ту 
SFX e у яце [вмн]у 
SFX e у аце жу 
SFX e у уць у 
SFX e ю еш ю 
SFX e ю е ю 
SFX e ю ём ю 
SFX e ю яце [аілуўью']ю 
SFX e ю юць ю 
SFX f Y 28
SFX f у уць у 
SFX f у уў у 
SFX f у ула у 
SFX f у улі у 
SFX f ю ць [аеыэя]ю 
SFX f ю ў [аеыэя]ю 
SFX f ю ла [аеыэя]ю 
SFX f ю лі [аеыэя]ю 
SFX f ую аваць ую 
SFX f ую аваў ую 
SFX f ую авала ую 
SFX f ую авалі ую 
SFX f юю яваць юю 
SFX f юю яваў юю 
SFX f юю явала юю 
SFX f юю явалі юю 
SFX f ць ў ць 
SFX f ць ла ць 
SFX f ць лі ць 
SFX f зці з зці 
SFX f зці зла зці 
SFX f зці злі зці 
SFX f сці ў сці 
SFX f сці ла сці 
SFX f сці лі сці 
SFX f чы 0 чы 
SFX f чы ла чы 
SFX f чы лі чы 
SFX g Y 18
SFX g у і [бвзлмнпсфц]у 
SFX g у іце [бвзлмнпсфц]у 
SFX g у ы [жрчш]у 
SFX g у ыце [жрчш]у 
SFX g гу жы гу 
SFX g гу жыце гу 
SFX g у зі ду 
SFX g у зіце ду 
SFX g ку чы ку 
SFX g ку чыце ку 
SFX g ту ці ту 
SFX g ту ціце ту 
SFX g ю і ю 
SFX g ю іце ю 
SFX g аць і аць 
SFX g аць іце аць 
SFX g ець і ець 
SFX g ець іце ець 
SFX h Y 12
SFX h у ь [змнс]у 
SFX h у ьце [змнс]у 
SFX h гу ж гу 
SFX h гу жце гу 
SFX h у зь ду 
SFX h у зьце ду 
SFX h у 0 [жрчш]у 
SFX h у це [жрчш]у 
SFX h ю й ю 
SFX h ю йце ю 
SFX h ць й ць 
SFX h ць йце ць 
SFX b Y 27
SFX b 0 ся [ую] 
SFX b у ешся [бвзмнс]у 
SFX b гу жашся гу 
SFX b у зешся ду 
SFX b у ашся [жрчш]у 
SFX b у ецца [бвзмнс]у 
SFX b гу жацца гу 
SFX b у зецца ду 
SFX b у ацца [жрчш]у 
SFX b у емся [бвзмнс]у 
SFX b гу жамся гу 
SFX b у земся ду 
SFX b у амся [жрчш]у 
SFX b у ецеся [бвзмнс]у 
SFX b гу жацеся гу 
SFX b у зецеся ду 
SFX b у ацеся [жрчш]у 
SFX b у уцца у 
SFX b ю ешся ю 
SFX b ю ецца ю 
SFX b ю емся ю 
SFX b ю ецеся ю 
SFX b ю юцца ю 
SFX b цца юся цца 
SFX b цца ешся цца 
SFX b цца емся цца 
SFX b цца ецеся цца 
SFX d Y 26
SFX d 0 ся [ую] 
SFX d у ешся [бвзмнпс]у 
SFX d гу жэшся гу 
SFX d у зешся ду 
SFX d у эшся [жрчш]у 
SFX d ку чэшся ку 
SFX d у ецца [бвзмнпс]у 
SFX d гу жэцца гу 
SFX d у зецца ду 
SFX d у эцца [жрчш]у 
SFX d ку чэцца ку 
SFX d у ёмся [бвзмнпс]у 
SFX d гу жомся гу 
SFX d у зёмся ду 
SFX d у омся [жрчш]у 
SFX d ку чомся ку 
SFX d ту цёмся ту 
SFX d у яцеся [вмн]у 
SFX d у уцца у 
SFX d ю ешся ю 
SFX d ю ецца ю 
SFX d ю ёмся ю 
SFX d ю яцеся [аілуўью']ю 
SFX d ю юцца ю 
SFX d цца ецца цца 
SFX d цца юцца цца 
SFX j Y 29
SFX j у уцца у 
SFX j у уўся у 
SFX j у улася у 
SFX j у уліся у 
SFX j ю цца [аеыэя]ю 
SFX j ю ўся [аеыэя]ю 
SFX j ю лася [аеыэя]ю 
SFX j ю ліся [аеыэя]ю 
SFX j ую авацца ую 
SFX j ую аваўся ую 
SFX j ую авалася ую 
SFX j ую аваліся ую 
SFX j юю явацца юю 
SFX j юю яваўся юю 
SFX j юю явалася юю 
SFX j юю яваліся юю 
SFX j ць цца ць 
SFX j ць ўся ць 
SFX j ць лася ць 
SFX j ць ліся ць 
SFX j сці ўся сці 
SFX j сці лася сці 
SFX j сці ліся сці 
SFX j чы ся чы 
SFX j чы лася чы 
SFX j чы ліся чы 
SFX j цца ўся цца 
SFX j цца лася цца 
SFX j цца ліся цца 
SFX x Y 14
SFX x у зься ду 
SFX x у зьцеся ду 
SFX x у ься [змнс]у 
SFX x у ьцеся [змнс]у 
SFX x у ся [жрчш]у 
SFX x у цеся [жрчш]у 
SFX x ю йся ю 
SFX x ю йцеся ю 
SFX x ць йся ць 
SFX x ць йцеся ць 
SFX x юся йся юся 
SFX x юся йцеся юся 
SFX x цца йся цца 
SFX x цца йцеся цца 
SFX y Y 18
SFX y у іся [бвзлмнпсфц]у 
SFX y у іцеся [бвзлмнпсфц]у 
SFX y у ыся [жрчш]у 
SFX y у ыцеся [жрчш]у 
SFX y гу жыся гу 
SFX y гу жыцеся гу 
SFX y у зіся ду 
SFX y у зіцеся ду 
SFX y ку чыся ку 
SFX y ку чыцеся ку 
SFX y ю іся ю 
SFX y ю іцеся ю 
SFX y аць іся аць 
SFX y аць іцеся аць 
SFX y юся іся юся 
SFX y юся іцеся юся 
SFX y уцца іся уцца 
SFX y уцца іцеся уцца 
SFX n Y 5
SFX n ць е [аеіыэя]ць 
SFX n ць юць [аеіыэя]ць 
SFX n уць е [мн]уць 
SFX n сці е сці 
SFX n сці юць сці 
SFX k Y 10
SFX k іць ь [злмнсц]іць 
SFX k іць ьце [злмнсц]іць 
SFX k віць ў віць 
SFX k віць ўце віць 
SFX k іць й [аео]іць 
SFX k іць йце [аео]іць 
SFX k ыць 0 [жрчш]ыць 
SFX k ыць це [жрчш]ыць 
SFX k ець ь [знс]ець 
SFX k ець ьце [знс]ець 
SFX l Y 10
SFX l іць і іць 
SFX l іць іце іць 
SFX l ыць ы ыць 
SFX l ыць ыце ыць 
SFX l ець і ець 
SFX l ець іце ець 
SFX l аць ы [жрчш]аць 
SFX l аць ыце [жрчш]аць 
SFX l аць і [мп]аць 
SFX l аць іце [мп]аць 
SFX m Y 17
SFX m іць лю [бмпф]іць 
SFX m іць ю [аеёіоуыэюялн]іць 
SFX m віць ўлю віць 
SFX m зіць жу зіць 
SFX m сіць шу сіць 
SFX m ціць чу [аеёіоуыэюя]ціць 
SFX m сціць шчу сціць 
SFX m ыць у [жрчш]ыць 
SFX m ець лю [мп]ець 
SFX m зець жу зець 
SFX m сець шу сець 
SFX m цець чу цець 
SFX m аць у [жрчш]аць 
SFX m аць лю [мп]аць 
SFX m ць ў [аеіы]ць 
SFX m ць ла [аеіы]ць 
SFX m ць лі [аеіы]ць 
SFX s Y 14
SFX s іць ься [злмнсц]іць 
SFX s іць ьцеся [злмнсц]іць 
SFX s віць ўся віць 
SFX s віць ўцеся віць 
SFX s іць йся [аео]іць 
SFX s іць йцеся [аео]іць 
SFX s ыць ся [жрчш]ыць 
SFX s ыць цеся [жрчш]ыць 
SFX s ець ься [знс]ець 
SFX s ець ьцеся [знс]ець 
SFX s іцца ься іцца 
SFX s іцца ьцеся іцца 
SFX s ыцца ся ыцца 
SFX s ыцца цеся ыцца 
